apertium-es-gl.es.dix
<pardef n="r/ogar__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ogaríamos</l> <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogaría</l>    <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogaríais</l>  <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogarías</l>   <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogarían</l>   <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogaría</l>    <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogaremos</l>  <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogaré</l>     <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogaréis</l>   <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogarás</l>    <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogarán</l>    <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogará</l>     <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogáremos</l>  <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogare</l>     <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogareis</l>   <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogares</l>    <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogaren</l>    <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogare</l>     <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogando</l>    <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogándo</l>    <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabiéndo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogamos</l>    <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogué</l>      <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogasteis</l>  <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogaste</l>    <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogaron</l>    <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogó</l>       <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogad</l>      <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oga</l>       <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><p><l>os</l><r>os<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogad</l>      <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabed"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogá</l>       <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabé"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogád</l>      <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabéd"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uega</l>      <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uéga</l>      <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sábe"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogar</l>      <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogar</l>      <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__saber"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogár</l>      <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabér"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogábamos</l>  <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogaba</l>     <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogabais</l>   <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogabas</l>    <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogaban</l>    <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogaba</l>     <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogáramos</l>  <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ogásemos</l>  <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogara</l>     <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ogase</l>     <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogarais</l>   <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ogaseis</l>   <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogaras</l>    <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ogases</l>    <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogaran</l>    <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ogasen</l>    <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogara</l>     <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ogase</l>     <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogadas</l>    <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogada</l>     <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogados</l>    <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogado</l>     <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogamos</l>    <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uego</l>      <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogáis</l>     <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uegas</l>     <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uegan</l>     <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uega</l>      <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oguemos</l>   <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uegue</l>     <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oguéis</l>    <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uegues</l>    <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ueguen</l>    <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uegue</l>     <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uéguen</l>    <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sábe"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uégue</l>     <r>ogar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sábe"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="rogar"><i>r</i><par n="r/ogar__vblex"/></e>
